Massachusetts, session 194th, H3369.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, as appearing in Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “bidder” in 96, the following:-
; provided however, for bids for school transportation contracts that include electric
vehicles, the procurement officer shall consider all criteria set forth in the invitation for bids
when awarding said contract
of 1